Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-561
Class V school district; board of education; meetings; open to public.

The regular meetings of the board of education of a Class V school district shall be held one or more times each month. Special meetings may be held as circumstances may demand at the call of the president of the board or on petition of a majority of the members of the board. All meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 6, p. 319;

R.S.1913, § 7012;

C.S.1922, § 6643;

C.S.1929, § 79-2706;

R.S.1943, § 79-2706;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 252, p. 776;

Laws 1972, LB 1268, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 812, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1109, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1003.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 314;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 27.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.